Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1407.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1202.1 heading and (b)(1)(i) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1202.1. [Instructional] Special Education Certificate Grade Spans and Age Levels and Duties of Department.--* * *(b) The Department of Education shall have the following duties:(1) Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this <--1234567891011121314151617181920 subsection:(i) (A) Notify all teacher preparation programs approved by the Department of Education, all individuals enrolled in these programs and all individuals holding an early childhood certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(b)(1) that an individual holding or seeking an early childhood certificate may, by attaining qualifying scores on the assessment made available by the Department of Education, extend the grade span for the individual's early childhood certificate to include grades five and six and include and maintain notice of the availability of the assessment on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Department of Education with other information describing certification requirements.(B) This subparagraph shall expire three years from the effective date of this clause JULY 1, 2027 . * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1202.2. Instructional Certificate Grade Spans and Age Levels.--(a) Notwithstanding 22 Pa. Code § 49.85 (relating to limitations), the grade spans and age levels for instructional certificates issued after June JULY 1, 2027 , shall be as follows:(1) Primary - prekindergarten, kindergarten, grades one through six or ages three (3) through eleven (11).(2) Secondary - grades six SEVEN through twelve or ages eleven (11) TWELVE (12) through twenty-one (21). (3) Specialized areas - prekindergarten through grade twelve or ages three (3) through twenty-one (21).(b) Certificates issued in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(a), (b) and (d) shall remain valid for the term of the 20250HB1407PN2106 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certificate.(c) An individual holding:(1) An Early Childhood instructional certificate issued in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(b)(1) or (d)(1) shall have two pathways to expand the scope of the individual's certificate to meet the grade levels covered under subsection (a)(1) by a process determined by the Department of Education, which shall be limited to continuing education credits for a specific certification level or by attaining qualifying scores on the assessment made available by the Department of Education.(2) An Elementary/Middle instructional certificate issued in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(b)(2) or (d)(2) shall have two pathways to expand the scope of the individual's certificate to meet the grade levels covered under subsection (a)(2) by a process determined by the Department of Education, which shall be limited to continuing education credits for a specific certification level or by attaining qualifying scores on the assessment made available by the Department of Education.(C) AN INDIVIDUAL HOLDING AN ELEMENTARY/MIDDLE INSTRUCTIONAL CERTIFICATE ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 22 PA. CODE § 49.85(B)(2) OR (D)(2) SHALL HAVE TWO PATHWAYS DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION TO EXPAND THE SCOPE OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S CERTIFICATE TO MEET THE GRADE LEVELS COVERED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2), WHICH SHALL BE LIMITED TO EITHER COMPLETING CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS FOR A SPECIFIC CERTIFICATION LEVEL OR ATTAINING QUALIFYING SCORES ON THE ASSESSMENT MADE AVAILABLE BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), an approved educator preparation program may permit an individual enrolled in a program prior to December 31, 2025 JULY 1, 2027 , and remaining 20250HB1407PN2106 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 continuously enrolled to complete the program for the grade level limitations provided under 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(d). The department may issue the appropriate Elementary/Middle instructional certificates to an applicant who completes the program and meets all other certification requirements. Beginning after December 31, 2025, an educator preparation program approved by the department shall no longer accept new candidates seeking a certificate under 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(d) (2). NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RESTRICT AN EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT FROM ACCEPTING NEW CANDIDATES SEEKING A CERTIFICATE UNDER PA. CODE § 49.85(D).(E) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING 22 PA. CODE § 49.85, AN EDUCATOR HOLDING AN EARLY CHILDHOOD CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER 22 PA. CODE § 49.85(B)(1) OR (D)(1) MAY TEACH FIFTH AND SIXTH GRADE. AN EDUCATOR HOLDING A SECONDARY SCHOOL CERTIFICATE MAY TEACH SIXTH GRADE IN THE SUBJECT AREA FOR WHICH THE SECONDARY CERTIFICATE IS ENDORSED.(2) THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION MAY ADOPT STANDARDS AND GUIDELINES AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION.(F) THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION MAY GRANT EXCEPTIONS TO THE GRADE AND AGE LEVEL LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION OR FOR THOSE ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 22 PA. CODE § 49.85. THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE STANDARDS OR GUIDELINES THAT OUTLINE THE CIRCUMSTANCES UNDER WHICH EXCEPTIONS SHALL BE GRANTED.(G) AN APPROVED EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAM SHALL:(1) REQUIRE INDIVIDUALS ENROLLED IN A PROGRAM WHO ARE PURSUING AN INSTRUCTIONAL CERTIFICATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) TO COMPLETE A MINIMUM OF THIRTY (30) CREDIT HOURS OF EARLY CHILDHOOD COURSEWORK. COURSEWORK SHALL INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE 20250HB1407PN2106 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 LIMITED TO, THE FOLLOWING TOPICS FOCUSED ON EARLY CHILDHOOD:(I) DEVELOPMENT STAGES;(II) LEARNING THEORIES;(III) CURRICULUM DEVELOPMENT;(IV) INSTRUCTIONAL STRATEGIES;(V) CONTENT KNOWLEDGE;(VI) LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS;(VII) OBSERVATION AND ASSESSMENT METHODS; AND(VIII) FAMILY AND COMMUNITY PARTNERSHIPS.(2) ESTABLISH PATHWAYS FOR OBSERVATION, RESEARCH AND STUDENT TEACHING WHICH FOCUS ON SPECIFIC CHILD AGES AND GRADES WITHIN PROGRAMS FOR INDIVIDUALS PURSUING AN INSTRUCTIONAL CERTIFICATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1).(3) ALLOW INDIVIDUALS ENROLLED IN A PROGRAM WHO ARE PURSUING AN INSTRUCTIONAL CERTIFICATE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) TO COMPLETE THEIR FIELDWORK AND STUDENT TEACHING IN EARLY CHILDHOOD SETTINGS, INCLUDING AT THEIR EMPLOYMENT SITE, PROVIDED THE EMPLOYMENT SITE MEETS FIELD PLACEMENT CRITERIA AND ENSURES THAT THE COOPERATING TEACHER IS A CERTIFIED EDUCATOR.(H) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:"EARLY CHILDHOOD" SHALL MEAN PRE-KINDERGARTEN, KINDERGARTEN AND GRADES ONE THROUGH THREE OR AGES THREE (3) THROUGH EIGHT (8).Section 3. The regulations at 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(c) and (d) are abrogated INSOFAR AS THEY ARE INCONSISTENT WITH THIS ACT.Section 4. The amendment or addition of sections 1202.1 heading and (b)(1)(i) and 1202.2 of the act shall apply beginning with the 2027-2028 academic year.Section 5. This act shall take effect as follows:20250HB1407PN2106 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Section 3 shall take effect in three years JULY 1, 2027.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1407PN2106 - 6 - <--1234